Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-101
Act, how cited.

Sections 38-101 to 38-1,148 and the following practice acts shall be known and may be cited as the Uniform Credentialing Act:

(1) The Advanced Practice Registered Nurse Practice Act;

(2) The Alcohol and Drug Counseling Practice Act;

(3) The Athletic Training Practice Act;

(4) The Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Practice Act;

(5) The Behavior Analyst Practice Act;

(6) The Certified Nurse Midwifery Practice Act;

(7) The Certified Registered Nurse Anesthetist Practice Act;

(8) The Chiropractic Practice Act;

(9) The Clinical Nurse Specialist Practice Act;

(10) The Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act;

(11) The Dentistry Practice Act;

(12) The Dialysis Patient Care Technician Registration Act;

(13) The Emergency Medical Services Practice Act;

(14) The Environmental Health Specialists Practice Act;

(15) The Funeral Directing and Embalming Practice Act;

(16) The Genetic Counseling Practice Act;

(17) The Hearing Instrument Specialists Practice Act;

(18) The Licensed Practical Nurse-Certified Practice Act until November 1, 2017;

(19) The Massage Therapy Practice Act;

(20) The Medical Nutrition Therapy Practice Act;

(21) The Medical Radiography Practice Act;

(22) The Medicine and Surgery Practice Act;

(23) The Mental Health Practice Act;

(24) The Nurse Practice Act;

(25) The Nurse Practitioner Practice Act;

(26) The Nursing Home Administrator Practice Act;

(27) The Occupational Therapy Practice Act;

(28) The Optometry Practice Act;

(29) The Perfusion Practice Act;

(30) The Pharmacy Practice Act;

(31) The Physical Therapy Practice Act;

(32) The Podiatry Practice Act;

(33) The Psychology Practice Act;

(34) The Respiratory Care Practice Act;

(35) The Surgical First Assistant Practice Act; and

(36) The Veterinary Medicine and Surgery Practice Act.

If there is any conflict between any provision of sections 38-101 to 38-1,148 and any provision of a practice act, the provision of the practice act shall prevail except as otherwise specifically provided in section 38-129.02.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 1, p. 454;

C.S.1929, § 71-101;

R.S.1943, § 71-101;

Laws 1972, LB 1067, § 1;

Laws 1984, LB 481, § 5;

Laws 1986, LB 277, § 2;

Laws 1986, LB 286, § 23;

Laws 1986, LB 355, § 8;

Laws 1986, LB 579, § 15;

Laws 1986, LB 926, § 1;

Laws 1987, LB 473, § 3;

Laws 1988, LB 557, § 12;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 4;

Laws 1989, LB 323, § 2;

Laws 1989, LB 344, § 4;

Laws 1991, LB 456, § 4;

Laws 1993, LB 48, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 187, § 3;

Laws 1993, LB 429, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 536, § 43;

Laws 1993, LB 669, § 2;

Laws 1994, LB 900, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 9;

Laws 1994, LB 1223, § 2;

Laws 1995, LB 406, § 10;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 371;

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 77;

Laws 1999, LB 178, § 1;

Laws 1999, LB 366, § 7;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 7;

Laws 2001, LB 25, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 209, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 270, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 398, § 19;

Laws 2002, LB 1021, § 4;

Laws 2002, LB 1062, § 11;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 13;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 8;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 103;

Laws 2005, LB 306, § 1;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 79;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-101;

Laws 2007, LB236, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB247, § 23;

Laws 2007, LB247, § 58;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 296;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB481, § 1;

Laws 2008, LB928, § 2;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 5;

Laws 2012, LB831, § 26;

Laws 2015, LB264, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB721, § 18;

Laws 2016, LB750, § 1;

Laws 2017, LB88, § 28;

Laws 2017, LB255, § 8;

Laws 2017, LB417, § 3;

Laws 2018, LB701, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB29, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB112, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB556, § 1;

Laws 2021, LB148, § 41;

Laws 2021, LB390, § 1;

Laws 2021, LB583, § 3;

Laws 2022, LB752, § 5;

Laws 2023, LB227, § 15.

Advanced Practice Registered Nurse Practice Act, see section 38-201.

Alcohol and Drug Counseling Practice Act, see section 38-301.

Athletic Training Practice Act, see section 38-401.

Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Practice Act, see section 38-501.

Certified Nurse Midwifery Practice Act, see section 38-601.

Certified Registered Nurse Anesthetist Practice Act, see section 38-701.

Chiropractic Practice Act, see section 38-801.

Clinical Nurse Specialist Practice Act, see section 38-901.

Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act, see section 38-1001.

Dentistry Practice Act, see section 38-1101.

Dialysis Patient Care Technician Registration Act, see section 38-3701.

Emergency Medical Services Practice Act, see section 38-1201.

Environmental Health Specialists Practice Act, see section 38-1301.

Funeral Directing and Embalming Practice Act, see section 38-1401.

Genetic Counseling Practice Act, see section 38-3401.

Hearing Instrument Specialists Practice Act, see section 38-1501.

Massage Therapy Practice Act, see section 38-1701.

Medical Nutrition Therapy Practice Act, see section 38-1801.

Medical Radiography Practice Act, see section 38-1901.

Medicine and Surgery Practice Act, see section 38-2001.

Mental Health Practice Act, see section 38-2101.

Nurse Practice Act, see section 38-2201.

Nurse Practitioner Practice Act, see section 38-2301.

Nursing Home Administrator Practice Act, see section 38-2401.

Occupational Therapy Practice Act, see section 38-2501.

Optometry Practice Act, see section 38-2601.

Perfusion Practice Act, see section 38-2701.

Pharmacy Practice Act, see section 38-2801.

Physical Therapy Practice Act, see section 38-2901.

Podiatry Practice Act, see section 38-3001.

Psychology Practice Act, see section 38-3101.

Respiratory Care Practice Act, see section 38-3201.

Surgical First Assistant Practice Act, see section 38-3501.

Veterinary Medicine and Surgery Practice Act, see section 38-3301.

The "Practice Acts" listed in this section specify which persons are deemed to be engaged in that profession or occupation or what practices constitute the profession or occupation. State v. Jones, 317 Neb. 559, 10 N.W.3d 747 (2024).